California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
 expenses of the procedure authorized by this chapter and of the general costs of the partition or an appropriate share thereof. Thereafter the court, upon motion of a party to the agreement or of the referee, made upon not less than 10 days’ notice to the parties who have appeared, shall determine whether the conditions have been fulfilled and, if so, shall enter judgment confirming the transfer; otherwise, upon such further proceedings as may be ordered, the action or proceeding shall be ordered terminated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.970.

The agreement binds the heirs, executors, administrators, successors, and assigns of the parties. In the event of default, the aggrieved parties may specifically enforce the agreement by further proceedings in the action or may pursue any other remedy they may have at law or in equity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

873.980.

The provisions of this chapter are cumulative and if, for default or other cause, interests are not transferred and acquired pursuant to this chapter, the parties may pursue their other rights of partition, subject to Section 873.970.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Costs of Partition [874.010. - 874.140.]



  ARTICLE 1. Allowance and Apportionment of Costs of Partition [874.010. - 874.050.]

874.010.

The costs of partition include:

(a) Reasonable attorney’s fees incurred or paid by a party for the common benefit.

(b) The fee and expenses of the referee.

(c) The compensation provided by contract for services of a surveyor or other person employed by the referee in the action.

(d) The reasonable costs of a title report procured pursuant to Section 872.220 with interest thereon at the legal rate from the time of
payment or, if paid before commencement of the action, from the time of commencement of the action. 

(e) Other disbursements or expenses determined by the court to have been incurred or paid for the common benefit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

874.020.

The costs of partition include reasonable expenses, including attorney’s fees, necessarily incurred by a party for the common benefit in prosecuting or defending other actions or other proceedings for the protection, confirmation, or perfection of title, setting the boundaries, or making a survey of the property, with interest thereon at the legal rate from the time of making the expenditures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

874.030.

Where disbursements have been made by a party under the direction of the court, interest at the legal rate shall be allowed thereon from the time of making such disbursements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

874.040.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, the court shall apportion the costs of partition among the parties in proportion to their interests or make such other apportionment as may be equitable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

874.050.

(a) The court may order that the share of the costs apportioned to a future interest be paid by other parties to the action or by the persons who are then the presumptive owners of the future interest.

(b) Where the court orders payment pursuant to this section, such payment is subject to a right of reimbursement, with interest at the legal rate, secured by a charge upon the future interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Payment of Costs of Partition [874.110. - 874.140.]

874.110.

(a) The costs of partition as apportioned by the court may be ordered paid in whole or in part prior to judgment.

(b) Any costs that remain unpaid shall be included and specified in the judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

874.120.

(a) The costs shall be a lien on the share of the party specified. 

(b) A lien imposed by this section has priority over any other lien on the share except those imposed under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

874.130.

Upon application of a person entitled to a lien imposed under this article and upon a showing of good cause, the court may order a sale of all or a portion of the property before or after judgment for the benefit of all such lien claimants without priority among them.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

874.140.

A judgment for unpaid costs of partition may be enforced by the person entitled to the costs in the manner provided for enforcement of money judgments generally against the share of the party specified in the judgment or against other property of the party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 60.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Judgment [874.210. - 874.240.]

874.210.

The judgment in the action is binding and conclusive on all of the following:

(a) All persons known and unknown who were parties to the action and who have or claim any interest in the property, whether present or future, vested or contingent, legal or beneficial, several or undivided.

(b) All persons not in being or not ascertainable at the time the judgment is entered who have any remainder interest in the property, or any part thereof, after the determination of a particular estate therein and who by any contingency may
 be entitled to a beneficial interest in the property, provided the judge shall make appropriate provision for the protection of such interests.

(c) Except as provided in Section 874.225, all persons who were not parties to the action and who have or claim any interest in the property which was not of record at the time the lis pendens was filed, or if none was filed, at the time the judgment was recorded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 20, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

874.225.

Except to the extent provided in Section 1908, the judgment does not affect a claim in the property or part thereof of any person who was not a party to the action if any of the following conditions is satisfied:

(a) The claim was of record at the time the lis pendens was filed or, if none was filed, at the time the judgment was recorded.

(b) The claim was actually known to the plaintiff or would have been reasonably apparent from an inspection of the property at the time the lis pendens was filed or, if none was filed, at
 the time the judgment was entered. For the purpose of this subdivision, a “claim in the property or part thereof” of any person means the interest of the person in the portion of the property or proceeds of sale thereof allocated to the plaintiff. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to impair the rights of a bona fide purchaser or encumbrancer for value dealing with the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s successors in interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 20, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

874.240.

A conveyance or transfer pursuant to Sections 873.750 and 873.790 or Section 873.960 is binding and conclusive, in the same manner as a judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Partition of Real Property Act [874.311. - 874.323.]

874.311.

(a) This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Partition of Real Property Act.

(b) This act applies to real property held in tenancy in common where there is no agreement in a record binding all the cotenants which governs the
 partition of the property.

(c) This act applies to actions for partition of real property filed on or after January 1, 2023.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 82, Sec. 3.   (AB 2245)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

874.312.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Determination of value” means a court order determining the fair market value of the property under Section 874.316 or 874.320 or adopting the valuation of the property agreed to by all cotenants.

(b) “Partition by sale” means a court-ordered sale of the entire property, whether by auction, sealed bids, or open-market sale conducted under Section 874.320.

(c) “Partition in kind” means the division of
 property into physically distinct and separately titled parcels.

(d) “Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 82, Sec. 4.   (AB 2245)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

874.313.

(a) In an action to partition real
 property, the property shall be partitioned under this chapter unless all of the cotenants otherwise agree in a record.

(b) This chapter supplements the other provisions of this title and, if an action is governed by this chapter, this chapter shall control over any provisions of this title that are inconsistent with this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 82, Sec. 5.   (AB 2245)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

874.314.

(a) This act does not limit or affect the method by which service of a complaint in a partition action may be made.

(b) If the plaintiff in a partition action seeks an order of notice by publication, the plaintiff, not later than 10 days after the court’s determination, shall post and maintain while the action is pending a conspicuous sign on the property that is the subject of the action. The sign shall state that the action has commenced and identify the name and address of the court and the
 common designation by which the property is known. The court may require the plaintiff to publish on the sign the name of the plaintiff and the known defendants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 82, Sec. 6.   (AB 2245)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

874.315.

If the court appoints referees pursuant to Section 873.010, each referee, in addition to any other requirements and disqualifications applicable to referees, shall be disinterested and impartial and not a party to or a participant in the action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 119, Sec. 2.   (AB 633)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

874.316.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), the court shall determine the fair market value of the property by ordering an appraisal pursuant to subdivision (d).

(b) If all cotenants have agreed to the value of the property or to another method of valuation, the court shall adopt that value or the value produced by the agreed method of valuation.

(c) If the court determines that the
 evidentiary value of an appraisal is outweighed by the cost of the appraisal, the court, after an evidentiary hearing, shall determine the fair market value of the property and send notice to the parties of the value.

(d) If the court orders an appraisal, the court shall appoint a disinterested real estate appraiser licensed in the State of California to determine the fair market value of the property assuming sole ownership of the fee simple estate. On completion of the appraisal, the appraiser shall file a sworn or verified appraisal with the court.

(e) If an appraisal is conducted pursuant to subdivision (d), not later than 10 days after the appraisal is filed, the court shall
 send notice to each party with a known address, stating all of the following:

(1) The appraised fair market value of the property.

(2) That the appraisal is available at the court clerk’s office.

(3) That a party may file with the court an objection to the appraisal not later than 30 days after the notice is sent, stating the grounds for the objection.

(f) If an appraisal is filed with the court pursuant to subdivision (d), the court shall conduct a hearing to determine the fair market value of the property not sooner than 30 days after a copy of the notice of the appraisal is sent to each party under subdivision (e), whether or not an objection to the appraisal is filed under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e). In addition to the court-ordered appraisal,
 the court may consider any other evidence of value offered by a party.

(g) After a hearing under subdivision (f), but before considering the merits of the partition action, the court shall determine the fair market value of the property and send notice to the parties of the value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 82, Sec. 7.   (AB 2245)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

874.317.

(a) If any cotenant requested partition by sale, the court shall, after the determination of value under Section 874.316, send notice to the parties that any cotenant except a cotenant that requested partition by sale may buy all the interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale.

(b) Not later than 45 days after the notice is sent under subdivision (a), any cotenant except a cotenant that requested partition by sale may give notice to the court that it elects to buy all the interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale.

(c) The purchase price for each of the interests of a cotenant that
 requested partition by sale is the value of the entire parcel
 determined under Section 874.316 multiplied by the cotenant’s fractional ownership of the entire parcel.

(d) After expiration of the period described in subdivision (b), the following rules apply:

(1) If only one cotenant elects to buy all the interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale, the court shall notify all the parties of that fact.

(2) If more than one cotenant elects to buy all the interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale, the court shall allocate the right to buy those interests among the electing cotenants based on each electing cotenant’s existing fractional ownership of the entire parcel divided by the total existing fractional ownership of all cotenants
 electing to buy and send notice to all the parties of that fact and of the price to be paid by each electing cotenant.

(3) If no cotenant elects to buy all the interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale, the court shall send notice to all the parties of that fact and resolve the partition action under paragraphs (a) and (b) of Section 874.318.

(e) If the court sends notice to the parties under paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (d), the court shall set a date, not sooner than 60 days after the date the notice was sent, by which electing cotenants shall pay their apportioned price into the court. After this date, the following rules apply:

(1) If all electing cotenants timely pay their apportioned price into
 court, the court shall issue an order reallocating all the interests of the cotenants and disburse the amounts held by the court to the persons entitled to them.

(2) If no electing cotenant timely pays its apportioned price, the court shall resolve the partition action under paragraphs (a) and (b) of Section 874.318 as if the interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale were not purchased.

(3) If one or more but not all of the electing cotenants fail to pay their apportioned price on time, the court, on motion, shall give notice to the electing cotenants that paid their apportioned price of the interest remaining and the price for all that interest.

(f) Not later than 20 days after the court gives notice pursuant to
 paragraph (3) of subdivision (e), any cotenant that paid may elect to purchase all of the remaining interest by paying the entire price into the court. After the 20-day period, the following rules apply:

(1) If only one cotenant pays the entire price for the remaining interest, the court shall issue an order reallocating the remaining interest to that cotenant. The court shall promptly issue an order reallocating the interests of all of the cotenants and disburse the amounts held by it to the persons entitled to them.

(2) If no cotenant pays the entire price for the remaining interest, the court shall resolve the partition action under paragraphs (a) and (b) of Section 874.318 as if the interests of the cotenants that requested partition by sale were not purchased.

(3) If more than one cotenant pays the entire price for the remaining interest, the court shall reapportion the remaining interest among those paying cotenants, based on each paying cotenant’s original fractional ownership of the entire parcel divided by the
 total original fractional ownership of all cotenants that paid the entire price for the remaining interest. The court shall issue promptly an order reallocating all of the cotenants’ interests, disburse the amounts held by it to the persons entitled to them, and promptly refund any excess payment held by the court.

(g) Not later than 45 days after the court sends notice to the parties pursuant to subdivision (a), any cotenant entitled to buy an interest under this section may request the court to authorize the sale as part of the pending action of the interests of cotenants named as defendants and served with the complaint but that did not appear in the action.

(h) If the court receives a timely request under subdivision (g), the court, after a hearing, may deny the request
 or authorize the requested additional sale on such terms as the court determines are fair and reasonable, subject to the following limitations:

(1) A sale authorized under this subdivision may occur only after the purchase prices for all interests subject to sale under subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive, have been paid into court and those interests have been reallocated among the cotenants as provided in those subdivisions.

(2) The purchase price for the interest of a nonappearing cotenant is based on the court’s determination of value under Section 874.316.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 119, Sec. 2.   (AB 633)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

874.318.

(a) If all the interests of all cotenants that requested partition by sale are not purchased by other cotenants pursuant to Section 874.317, or if after conclusion of the buyout under Section 874.317 a cotenant remains that has requested partition in kind, the court shall order partition in kind unless the court, after consideration of the factors listed in Section 874.319, finds that partition in kind will result in great prejudice to the cotenants as a group. In considering whether to order partition in kind, the court shall approve a request by two or more parties to have their individual interests aggregated.

(b) If the court does not order partition in kind under
 subdivision (a), the court shall order partition by sale pursuant to Section 874.320 or, if no cotenant requested partition by sale, the court shall dismiss the action.

(c) If the court orders partition in kind pursuant to subdivision (a), the court may require that one or more cotenants pay one or more other cotenants amounts so that the payments, taken together with the value of the in-kind distributions to the cotenants, will make the partition in kind just and proportionate in value to the fractional interests held.

(d) If the court orders partition in kind, the court shall allocate to the cotenants that are unknown, unlocatable, or the subject of a default judgment, if their interests were not bought out, a part of the property representing the combined interests of these
 cotenants as determined by the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 119, Sec. 2.   (AB 633)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

874.319.

(a) In determining whether partition in kind would result in great prejudice to the cotenants as a group, the court shall consider the following:

(1) Whether the property practicably can be divided among the cotenants.

(2) Whether partition in kind would apportion the property in such a way that the aggregate fair market value of the parcels resulting from the division would be materially less than the value of the property if it were sold as a whole, taking into account the condition under which a court-ordered sale likely would occur.

(3) Evidence of the collective duration of ownership or possession of the property by a cotenant and one or more predecessors in title or predecessors in possession to the cotenant who are or were relatives of the cotenant or each other.

(4) A cotenant’s sentimental attachment to the property, including any attachment arising because the property has ancestral or other unique or special value to the cotenant.

(5) The lawful use being made of the property by a cotenant and the degree to which the cotenant would be harmed if the cotenant could not continue the same use of the property.

(6) The degree to which the cotenants have contributed their pro rata share of the property taxes, insurance, and other expenses associated with maintaining ownership of the property or have contributed to the physical
 improvement, maintenance, or upkeep of the property.

(7) Any other relevant factor.

(b) The court shall not consider any one factor in subdivision (a) to be dispositive without weighing the totality of all relevant factors and circumstances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 82, Sec. 8.   (AB 2245)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

874.320.

(a) If the court orders a sale of property, the sale shall be an open-market sale unless the court finds that a sale by sealed bids or an auction would be more economically advantageous and in the best interest of the cotenants as a group.

(b) If the court orders an open-market sale and the parties, not later than 10 days after the entry of the order, agree on a real estate broker licensed in the State of California to offer the property for sale, the court shall appoint the broker and establish a reasonable commission. If the parties do not agree on a broker, the court shall appoint a disinterested real estate broker licensed in the State of California to offer the
 property for sale and shall establish a reasonable commission. The broker shall offer the property for sale in a commercially reasonable manner at a price no lower than the determination of value and on the terms and conditions established by the court.

(c) If the broker appointed under subdivision (b) obtains within a reasonable time an offer to purchase the property for at least the determination of value, the following requirements apply:

(1) The broker shall comply with the reporting requirements in Section 874.321.

(2) The sale shall be completed in accordance with state law.

(d) If the broker appointed under subdivision (b) does not obtain an offer to purchase the property for at least the determination of value within a reasonable time, the
 court, after a hearing, may do any of the following:

(1) Approve the highest outstanding offer, if any.

(2) Redetermine the value of the property and order that the property continue to be offered for an additional time.

(3) Order that the property be sold by sealed bids or at an auction.

(e) If the court orders a sale by sealed bids or an auction, the court shall set terms and conditions of the sale. If the court orders an auction, the auction shall be conducted under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 873.510).

(f) If a purchaser is entitled to a share of the proceeds of the sale, the purchaser is entitled to a credit against the price in an amount equal to the purchaser’s share of the
 proceeds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 82, Sec. 9.   (AB 2245)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

874.321.

(a) A broker appointed to offer property for open-market sale shall file a report with the court not later than seven days after receiving an offer to purchase the property for at least the value determined under Section 874.316 or 874.320.

(b) The report required by subdivision (a) shall contain the following information:

(1) A description of the property to be sold to each buyer.

(2) The name of each buyer.

(3) The proposed purchase price.

(4) The terms and conditions of the proposed sale, including the terms of any owner financing.

(5) The amounts to be paid to lienholders.

(6) A statement of contractual or other arrangements or conditions of the broker’s commission.

(7) Other material facts relevant to the sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 82, Sec. 10.   (AB 2245)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

874.321.5.

In an action for partition of property, the court may apportion the costs of partition, including an appraisal fee, pursuant to Section 874.040, except that the court shall not apportion the costs of partition to any party that opposes the partition unless doing so is equitable and consistent with the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 82, Sec. 11.   (AB 2245)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

874.323.

This act modifies, limits, and supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et seq.), but does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act (15 U.S.C. Section 7001(c)), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that act (15 U.S.C. Section 7003(b)).

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 119, Sec. 2.   (AB 633)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 11. CONTRIBUTION AMONG JOINT JUDGMENT DEBTORS [875. - 883.]



  CHAPTER 1. Releases From and Contribution Among Joint Tortfeasors [875. - 880.]

875.

(a) Where a money judgment has been rendered jointly against two or more defendants in a tort action there shall be a right of contribution among them as hereinafter provided.

(b) Such right of contribution shall be administered in accordance with the principles of equity.

(c) Such right of contribution may be enforced only after one tortfeasor has, by payment, discharged the joint judgment or has paid more than his pro rata share thereof. It shall be limited to the excess so paid over the pro rata share of the person so
 paying and in no event shall any tortfeasor be compelled to make contribution beyond his own pro rata share of the entire judgment.

(d) There shall be no right of contribution in favor of any tortfeasor who has intentionally injured the injured person.

(e) A liability insurer who by payment has discharged the liability of a tortfeasor judgment debtor shall be subrogated to his right of contribution.

(f) This title shall not impair any right of indemnity under existing law, and where one tortfeasor judgment debtor is entitled to indemnity from another there shall be no right of contribution between them.

(g) This title shall not impair the right of a plaintiff to satisfy a judgment in full as against any tortfeasor judgment debtor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1700.)
-------------------------------------------

876.

(a) The pro rata share of each tortfeasor judgment debtor shall be determined by dividing the entire judgment equally among all of them.

(b) Where one or more persons are held liable solely for the tort of one of them or of another, as in the case of the liability of a master for the tort of his servant, they shall contribute a single pro rata share, as to which there may be indemnity between them.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1700.)
-------------------------------------------

877.

Where a release, dismissal with or without prejudice, or a covenant not to sue or not to enforce judgment is given in good faith before verdict or judgment to one or more of a number of tortfeasors claimed to be liable for the same tort, or to one or more other co-obligors mutually subject to contribution rights, it shall have the following effect:

(a) It shall
 not discharge any other such party from liability unless its terms so provide, but it shall reduce the claims against the others in the amount stipulated by the release, the dismissal or the covenant, or in the amount of the consideration paid for it, whichever is the greater.

(b) It shall discharge the party to whom it is given from all liability for any contribution to any other parties.

(c) This section shall not apply to co-obligors who have expressly agreed in writing to an apportionment of liability for losses or claims among themselves.

(d) This section shall not apply to a release, dismissal with or without prejudice, or a covenant not to sue or not to enforce judgment given to a co-obligor on an alleged contract debt where the contract was made prior to January 1, 1988.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 39.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

877.5.

(a) Where an agreement or covenant is made which provides for a sliding scale recovery agreement between one or more, but not all, alleged defendant tortfeasors and the plaintiff or plaintiffs:

(1) The parties entering into any such agreement or covenant shall promptly inform the court in which the action is pending of the existence of the agreement or covenant and its terms and provisions.

(2) If the action is tried before a jury, and a defendant party to the agreement is called as a witness at trial,
 the court shall, upon motion of a party, disclose to the jury the existence and content of the agreement or covenant, unless the court finds that this disclosure will create substantial danger of undue prejudice, of confusing the issues, or of misleading the jury.

The jury disclosure herein required shall be no more than necessary to inform the jury of the possibility that the agreement may bias the testimony of the witness.

(b) As used in this section, a “sliding scale recovery agreement” means an agreement or covenant between a plaintiff or plaintiffs and one or more, but not all, alleged tortfeasor defendants, which limits the liability of the agreeing tortfeasor defendants to an amount which is dependent upon the amount of recovery which the plaintiff is able to recover from the nonagreeing defendant or defendants. This includes, but is not limited to, agreements within the scope of Section 877,
 and agreements in the form of a loan from the agreeing tortfeasor defendant or defendants to the plaintiff or plaintiffs which is repayable in whole or in part from the recovery against the nonagreeing tortfeasor defendant or defendants.

(c) No sliding scale recovery agreement is effective unless, at least 72 hours prior to entering into the agreement, a notice of intent to enter into an agreement has been served on all nonsignatory alleged defendant tortfeasors. However, upon a showing of good cause, the court or a judge thereof may allow a shorter time. The failure to comply with the notice requirements of this subdivision shall not constitute good cause to delay commencement of trial.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 17, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

877.6.

(a) (1) Any party to an action in which it is alleged that two or more parties are joint tortfeasors or co-obligors on a contract debt shall be entitled to a hearing on the issue of the good faith of a settlement entered into by the plaintiff or other claimant and one or more alleged tortfeasors or co-obligors, upon giving notice in the manner provided in subdivision (b) of Section 1005. Upon a
 showing of good cause, the court may shorten the time for giving the required notice to permit the determination of the issue to be made before the commencement of the trial of the action, or before the verdict or judgment if settlement is made after the trial has commenced.

(2) In the alternative, a settling party may give notice of settlement to all parties and to the court, together with an application for determination of good faith settlement and a proposed order. The application shall indicate the settling parties, and the basis, terms, and amount of the settlement. The notice, application, and proposed order shall be given by certified mail, return receipt requested, or by personal service. Proof of service shall be filed with the court. Within 25 days of the mailing of the notice, application, and proposed order, or within 20 days of personal service, a nonsettling party may file a notice of motion to contest the good faith of the
 settlement. If none of the nonsettling parties files a motion within 25 days of mailing of the notice, application, and proposed order, or within 20 days of personal service, the court may approve the settlement. The notice by a nonsettling party shall be given in the manner provided in subdivision (b) of Section 1005. However, this paragraph shall not apply to settlements in which a confidentiality agreement has been entered into regarding the case or the terms of the settlement.

(b) The issue of the good faith of a settlement may be determined by the court on the basis of affidavits served with the notice of hearing, and any counteraffidavits filed in response, or the court may, in its discretion, receive other evidence at the hearing.

(c) A determination by the court that the settlement was made in good faith shall bar any other joint tortfeasor or co-obligor from any further
 claims against the settling tortfeasor or co-obligor for equitable comparative contribution, or partial or comparative indemnity, based on comparative negligence or comparative fault.

(d) The party asserting the lack of good faith shall have the burden of proof on that issue.

(e) When a determination of the good faith or lack of good faith of a settlement is made, any party aggrieved by the determination may petition the proper court to review the determination by writ of mandate. The petition for writ of mandate shall be filed within 20 days after service of written notice of the determination, or within any additional time not exceeding 20 days as the trial court may allow.

(1) The court shall, within 30 days of the receipt of all materials to be filed by the parties, determine whether or not the court will hear
 the writ and notify the parties of its determination.

(2) If the court grants a hearing on the writ, the hearing shall be given special precedence over all other civil matters on the calendar of the court except those matters to which equal or greater precedence on the calendar is granted by law.

(3) The running of any period of time after which an action would be subject to dismissal pursuant to the applicable provisions of Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 583.110) of Title 8 of Part 2 shall be tolled during the period of review of a determination pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 64, Sec. 1.   (SB 543)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

878.

Judgment for contribution may be entered by one tortfeasor judgment debtor against other tortfeasor judgment debtors by motion upon notice. Notice of such motion shall be given to all parties in the action, including the plaintiff or plaintiffs, at least 10 days before the hearing thereon. Such notice shall be accompanied by an affidavit setting forth any information which the moving party may have as to the assets of defendants available for satisfaction of the judgment or claim for contribution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1700.)
-------------------------------------------

879.

If any provision of this title or the application thereof to any person is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the title which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application and to this end the provisions of this title are declared to be severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1700.)
-------------------------------------------

880.

This title shall become effective as to causes of action accruing on or after January 1, 1958.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1700.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Contribution Among Other Judgment Debtors [881. - 883.]

881.

This chapter governs contribution among joint judgment debtors other than joint tortfeasors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 63.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

882.

If two or more judgment debtors are jointly liable on a money judgment:

(a) A judgment debtor who has satisfied more than his or her due proportion of the judgment, whether voluntarily or through enforcement procedures, may compel contribution from another judgment debtor who has satisfied less than his or her due proportion of the judgment.

(b) If the judgment is based upon an obligation of one judgment debtor as surety for another and the surety satisfies the judgment or any part thereof, whether voluntarily or through
 enforcement procedures, the surety may compel repayment from the principal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 63.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

883.

(a) A judgment debtor entitled to compel contribution or repayment pursuant to this chapter may apply on noticed motion to the court that entered the judgment for an order determining liability for contribution or repayment. The application shall be made at any time before the judgment is satisfied in full or within 30 days thereafter.

(b) The order determining liability for contribution or repayment entitles the judgment debtor to the benefit of the judgment to enforce the
 liability, including every remedy that the judgment creditor has against the persons liable, to the extent of the liability.

(c) Nothing in this section limits any other remedy that a judgment debtor entitled to contribution or repayment may have.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 77, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 13. APPEALS IN CIVIL ACTIONS [901. - 936.1.]



  CHAPTER 1. Appeals in General [901. - 914.]

901.

A judgment or order in a civil action or proceeding may be reviewed as prescribed in this title. The Judicial Council shall prescribe rules for the practice and procedure on appeal not inconsistent with the provisions of this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

902.

Any party aggrieved may appeal in the cases prescribed in this title. A party appealing is known as an appellant, and an adverse party as a respondent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

902.1.

In any case in which a notice was required pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 664.5, the Attorney General shall have the right to intervene and participate in any appeal taken therefrom. These rights shall apply regardless of whether the Attorney General participated in the case in the trial court. However, the Attorney General has no direct right to appeal. If the Attorney General elects not to intervene and participate in the appeal, he or she shall file a statement with the Legislature and the Judicial Council stating the reason or reasons for the decision